Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Doran Act of
2025".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-1030 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 12301 Page 1

A. As used in this section, "health spa" means any person,
firm, corporation, organization, club, or association engaged in the
sale of:
1. Memberships in a program of physical exercise that includes
the use of one or more sauna, whirlpool, weightlifting room,
massage, steam room, or exercising machine or device; or
2. The right or privilege to use exercise equipment or
facilities such as a sauna, whirlpool, weightlifting room, massage,
steam room, or exercising machine or device, including, but not
limited to:
a. for-profit businesses, firms, corporations,
organizations, clubs, or associations,
b. bona fide nonprofit organizations, including, but not
limited to, the Young Men's Christian Association,
Young Women's Christian Association, or similar
organizations whose functions as health spas are only
incidental to the overall functions and purposes,
c. any organization primarily operated for the purpose of
teaching a particular form of martial arts such as
judo or karate,
d. any college or university fitness center,
e. any country club, or
f. weight-loss or weight-control services which do not
provide physical exercise facilities and which do not
Req. No. 12301 Page 2

obligate the customer for more than twenty-five (25)
months.
B. 1. Each health spa shall have at least one automated
external defibrillator on the premises.
2. The defibrillator shall at all times be placed in the
location that best provides accessibility to staff, members, and
guests.
3. An unstaffed health spa shall have on the premises:
a. a telephone for 9-1-1 telephone call access, and
b. in plain view:
(1) a sign indicating the location of the automated
external defibrillator, and
(2) a sign providing instruction in the use of the
automated external defibrillator and in
cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
C. No cause of action against a health spa or its employees may
arise in connection with the use or nonuse of an automated external
defibrillator unless the health spa has:
1. Failed to purchase an automated external defibrillator as
required under this section; or
2. Acted with gross negligence in the use of an automated
external defibrillator.


Req. No. 12301 Page 3

D. If a health spa does not comply with this section, any
contract for health spa services shall be voidable at the option of
the buyer.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12301 TJ 01/31/25


















Req. No. 12301 Page 4